Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-459
Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 59, p. 1576.